District of Columbia statutes.
29-503

Applicability.

This chapter shall not apply to any corporation now in existence or hereafter organized which may lawfully render professional services other than pursuant to this chapter. This chapter shall not alter or affect any existing or future right or privilege permitting or not prohibiting performance of professional services through the use of any form of business organization. A corporation organized under Chapter 3 of this title may be brought within this chapter by complying with this chapter and filing amended or restated articles of incorporation meeting the requirements of § 29-506.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-403.
1981 Ed., § 29-603.
1973 Ed., § 29-1103.

Editor's Notes

Former § 29-503 has been recodified as § 36-503.